Massachusetts, session 194th, H950.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 132B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 6K the following section:-
Section 6L. (a) No individual shall use a pesticide that contains the herbicide
substance Glyphosate, unless the individual is appropriately licensed or authorized by the
department pursuant to subsection (b).
The department’s licensure or authorization of an individual to use a pesticide
containing said herbicide substance which has been registered as being for general use, shall be
required when the pesticide is to be used on any land, whether or not the land is owned or
of 4

controlled by the individual for any non-agricultural purpose or for the purpose of growing
agricultural commodities.
(b) An individual who holds a valid certification, license or permit issued by the
department as a certified applicator, commercial applicator, private applicator, licensed
applicator or as an appropriate individual authorized by permit, may use a pesticide containing
said herbicide substance, which is registered for a general use or restricted use, subject to
compliance with all applicable provisions of this chapter and department regulations for the type
of use such pesticide is classified.
If a pesticide that contains said herbicide substance is registered for a general
use, an individual who holds a valid applicators license may use a pesticide containing said
herbicide substance on any land without being under the direct supervision of another who is a
certified applicator.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, when a
pesticide contains said herbicide substance which is registered for general use, the following
conditions on the sale of such pesticide to the public shall apply:
No person shall offer for sale, sell, retail, supply or make available any pesticide
that contains said herbicide substance, to an individual who does not hold the appropriate
department issued certification, license or permit under the prior subsection.
No person shall offer for sale, sell, supply, retail or allow the public, including
its customers, to access or purchase any pesticide containing said herbicide substance without
first verifying that a customer holds a valid department issued certification, license or permit.
of 4

No person shall sell, retail or supply any pesticide containing said herbicide
substance to a customer, unless the delivery of such pesticide occurs on the premises of its
registered
business establishment.
(d) A person desiring to register its the business establishment to sell, distribute,
supply or provide to its customers any pesticide containing said herbicide substance shall make
an application to the department. A person making an application for a registration or renewal of
a registration, shall provide the information as required by the department, and pay the
registration fee, not to exceed 25 dollars as established by regulation, for each business
establishment to be registered.
Registrations or renewal of registrations, issued by the department shall be for a term
not to exceed 1 year for each business establishment.
The department shall grant a registration, or renewal of a registration, pursuant to the
terms, conditions and restrictions as provided under the regulations of the department, as it
deems necessary and appropriate. A registration may be revoked at any time the department
finds its terms, conditions and restrictions of the registration or applicable regulations are being
violated.
(e) Nothing in this section shall preempt or limit the subcommittee of the pesticide
board from registering any pesticide that contains said herbicide substance, or determining the
classification of such pesticide as being for a general use or a restricted use.
of 4

If the subcommittee determines that a pesticide containing said herbicide
substance should be registered for a restricted use under section 7, then a person using such
pesticide, shall comply with all applicable provisions of this chapter and regulations for pesticide
classified for restricted use.
The subcommittee may also determine that a pesticide containing said herbicide
substance, which is classified for restricted use, also requires further limitations, which may
include that such pesticide: (i) is restricted to certain individuals or groups, (ii) requires the
department’s written permission prior to each use; or (iii) requires further restriction in any other
manner.
(f) As used in this section, the words “Use a pesticide”, shall include the spraying,
releasing, depositing or applying a pesticide containing said herbicide substance.
SECTION 2. The second paragraph of section 14 of said chapter 132B of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition is hereby amended by striking out, in
lines 9 and 10, the words, “inclusive, or section 7A” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- inclusive, or section 6L, or section 7
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect 12 months after passage.
of 4